Oklahoma, session 2026, SB171.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 11, O.S.L. 2023
(74 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 465), is amended to read as follows:
Section 465. A. The Commissioner of Public Safety may shall,
in conjunction with either the President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma
State Senate or the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of
Representatives, commission as peace officers one member no more
than two members of the security team of the Oklahoma State Senate
and one member no more than two members of the security team of the
Oklahoma House of Representatives, provided such commissioned
officers must obtain and maintain certification as full-time peace

officers pursuant to Section 3311 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
B. Any such commissioned officers are hereby declared to be
peace officers of the State of Oklahoma and shall be so deemed and
taken in all courts having jurisdiction of offenses against the laws
of the state. Such commissioned officers shall have the powers and
authority now and hereafter vested by law in other peace officers,
including the power of arrest, enforcement of the criminal laws of
this state, search and seizure, and the authority for serving or
execution of civil process.
C. The jurisdiction of such commissioned officers shall include
all powers of arrest granted to the sergeant at arms as set forth in
Section 773 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes, but the
jurisdiction of such commissioned officers shall otherwise be
limited to the Capitol building, grounds, and parking lots described
in Sections 15.1 and 15.3 of Title 73 of the Oklahoma Statutes be
pursuant to Sections 99 and 99a of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, and shall include all powers of arrest granted to the
sergeant at arms as set forth in Section 773 of this title, but such
jurisdiction shall be effective only while in the performance of
official duties.
D. Any commission issued by the Commissioner pursuant to this
section shall be subject to all requirements set forth by the
Commissioner, and the Commissioner may limit the power and scope of
the commission. Further, the Commissioner may suspend or revoke the
commission for any reason, and the commission shall be deemed
terminated upon the commissioned officer's separation of service or
reassignment to another position outside the security team of their
respective bodies.
E. Such commissioned officers shall not be deemed to be
officers, agents, or employees of the Department of Public Safety,
and no action or omission by such commissioned officers shall be
deemed to be an action or omission of the Department of Public
Safety.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 171 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 5th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 29th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 171 Page 3